District of Columbia statutes.
22-1318

Driving or riding on footways in public grounds.

If any person shall drive or lead any horse, mule, or other animal, or any cart, wagon, or other carriage whatever on any of the paved or graveled footways in and on any of the public grounds belonging to the United States within the District of Columbia, or shall ride thereon, except at the intersection of streets, alleys, and avenues, each and every such offender shall forfeit and pay for each offense a sum not less than $1 nor more than $5.

History

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 325, ch. 320, § 16

Cross References

Conduct of prosecutions under this section, see § 22-1809.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1118.
1973 Ed., § 22-1118.